en: Frozen strawberries
da: Frosne jordbær
de: Gefrorene Erdbeeren
es: Fresas congeladas
fr: Fraises surgelées
hr: Smrznute jagode
it: Fragole surgelate
lt: Šaldytos braškės
nl: Aardbeien (diepvries), Bevroren aardbeien
sv: Frysta jordgubbar

en: Frozen lingonberries, frozen Cowberries
fr: Airelles surgelées, Airelles rouges surgelées

en: Frozen Sea-buckthorn
fr: Baies d'argousiers surgelés

en: Frozen Gooseberries
fr: Groseilles à maquereaux surgelées

en: Frozen citrus
es: Cítricos congelados
fr: Agrumes surgelés
hr: Smrznuti citrusi
lt: Šaldyti citrusiniai vaisiai
nl: Citrusfruit (diepvries), Bevroren citrusfruit

en: Frozen pomegranates
es: Granadas congeladas
fr: Grenades surgelées
hr: Smrznuti šipak
lt: Šaldyti granatų vaisiai
nl: Granaatappels (diepvries), Bevroren granaatappels, Diepvries granaatappels
pt: Romãs congeladas

en: Frozen tropical fruits
de: Gefrorene Tropenfrüchte
es: Frutas tropicales congeladas
fr: Fruits tropicaux surgelés, fruits exotiques surgelés
hr: Smrznuto tropsko voće
lt: Šaldyti tropiniai vaisiai
nl: Tropisch fruit (diepvries), Bevroren tropische vruchten

en: Frozen avocados
da: Frosne avokadoer
es: Aguacates congelados
fr: Avocats surgelés
hr: Smrznuti avokado
lt: Šaldyti avokadai
nl: Avocados (diepvries), Bevroren avocados, Diepvries avocados
sv: Frysta avokador

en: Frozen diced avocados
da: Frosne ternede avokadoer
sv: Frysta tärnade avokador, Frysta avokador i tärningar

en: Frozen pineapples
da: Frosne ananasser
de: Gefrorene Ananas
es: Piñas congeladas
fr: Ananas surgelés
hr: Smrznuti ananas
lt: Šaldyti ananasai
nl: Ananas (diepvries), Bevroren ananas, Diepvriesananas
sv: Frysta ananaser

en: Frozen mangos
nl: Mangos (diepvries), Diepvriesmangos

en: Frozen mixed fruits
de: Gefrorene gemischte Früchte
es: Mezclas de frutas congeladas
fr: Mélanges de fruits surgelés
hr: Smrznuto miješano voće
it: Frutta mista surgelata
lt: Šaldyti įvairūs vaisiai
nl: Bevroren fruitmelanges, Diepvriesfruit

en: Frozen mixed berries
de: Gefrorene gemischte Beeren
es: Mezclas de frutas del bosque congeladas, Mezclas de frutos rojos congelados
fr: Mélanges de fruits rouges surgelés
hr: Smrznuto miješano bobičasto voće
it: Bacche miste surgelate
lt: Šaldytos įvairios uogos
nl: Bevroren rood fruit melanges

en: Frozen mixed tropical fruits
es: Mezclas de frutas tropicales congeladas
fr: Mélanges de fruits tropicaux surgelés, Mélanges de fruits exotiques surgelés
hr: Smrznuto miješano tropsko voće
lt: Šaldyti įvairūs tropiniai vaisiai
nl: Bevroren tropische vruchtenmelanges

en: Dried fruits
bg: Сушени плодове
ca: Fruita deshidratada
cs: Sušené ovoce
da: Tørrede frugter
de: Dörrobst, Backobst, Trockenobst, Trockenfrüchte, getrocknete Früchte, gedörrte Früchte, gedörrtes Obst, getrocknetes Obst
es: Frutas deshidratadas, Frutas desecadas, Frutas secas
fi: kuivatut hedelmät
fr: Fruits secs, fruits séchés, fruit sec, fruit séché
he: פירות יבשים, פירות מיובשים
hr: Sušeno voće, suho voće
hu: Aszalt gyümölcsök
it: Frutte secche, Frutta secca
lt: Džiovinti vaisiai
nl: Gedroogd fruit
pl: Suszone owoce
pt: Frutas secas
ro: fructe uscate
ru: Сушеные фрукты
sv: Torkade frukter
th: ผลไม้แห้ง
tr: Kurutulmuş meyve
zh: 干燥水果

en: Dates and their products
da: Dadler og daddelprodukter
sv: Dadlar och dadelprodukter

en: Dates, date
ar: تمر
be: Фінікі
bg: Фурми
ca: dàtil
cs: datle
da: Dadler, Daddel
de: Datteln, Dattel
el: Χουρμάς
eo: daktilo
es: dátiles, dátil
et: Datlid
eu: Datil
fi: taatelit
fr: dattes, datte
gl: Dátil
gu: બોર
he: תמרים
hr: Datumi
ht: Dat
ia: Dactylo
it: datteri, dattero
ja: デーツ
kn: ಖರ್ಜೂರದ ಹಣ್ಣು
lt: Datulė, datulės
nl: dadels
nn: dadler
nv: Hashkʼaan dijéʼé
pl: Daktyle
ro: Curmală
ru: финик, финики
sk: Datľa
sv: Dadlar, Dadel
tr: Hurma
tt: хөрмә җимеше
uk: фініки
zh: 椰枣

en: Date pastes
da: Daddelpastaer
fr: Pâtes de dattes
sv: Dadelpastaer

en: Pitted dates
bg: Обезкостени фурми
da: Udkernede dadler, Udstenede dadler
de: entkernte Datteln
es: Dátiles sin hueso, Dátiles deshuesados
fr: Dattes dénoyautées
hr: Datulje bez koštice
lt: Datulės be kauliukų
nl: Ontpitte dadels
ru: Финики без косточки, финики без косточек
sv: Urkärnade dadlar

en: Whole dates
da: Hele dadler
de: ganze Datteln
es: Dátiles con hueso
fi: Kokonaiset taatelit
fr: Dattes entières
he: תמרים שלמים
hr: Cijele datulje
nl: Dadels met pit
ru: Финики с косточкой
sv: Hela dadlar